Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB353.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 99.700 TO 99.730 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of establishing the basis for the use of eminent domain for the
remediation of a blighted property or possession of an abandoned property, a
commission or alternative government entity is authorized to petition a court of
competent jurisdiction to obtain an administrative warrant to gain access to
inspect a specific structure.
(2) The court may issue an administrative warrant for inspection of a structure upon
a showing by the commission or alternative government entity of probable cause
that a violation of an enforceable housing, maintenance, or building code has
occurred, the violation has not been cured, and the owner of the property has
denied the commission or alternative government entity access to the specific
structure.
(3) Evidence that may support a showing of probable cause includes but is not
limited to recent fire or police inspections, exterior evidence of deterioration, or
other similarly reliable evidence of present violations of an enforceable housing,
maintenance, or building code in the specific structure.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 99.700 TO 99.730 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including any charter provision,
ordinance, statute, or special law, all commissions and alternative government
entities shall exercise the power of eminent domain in accordance with KRS
99.700 to 99.730, including all procedures, definitions, remedies, and limitations.
(2) Additional procedures, remedies, or limitations that do not deny or diminish the
substantive and procedural rights and protections of property owners under KRS
Page 1 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
99.700 to 99.730 may be provided by other law, ordinance, or charter.
Section 3. KRS 65.355 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any local government, the county or independent school district within the county,
and the Commonwealth of Kentucky may enter into an interlocal cooperation
agreement pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 for the purpose of establishing a land
bank authority pursuant to KRS 65.350 to 65.375.
(2) The authority shall be a public body corporate and politic with the power to sue and
be sued, issue deeds in its name, and any other powers necessary and convenient to
carry out these powers or that may be granted to the authority by the parties.
(3) The authority shall be established to acquire the tax delinquent properties of the
parties, properties that have become blighted or abandoned[deteriorated] as defined
in[by] KRS 99.705 and properties that have local government liens filed against
them, to facilitate the public purpose of returning property that is in a non-revenue
generating, non-tax producing status to effective utilization, including but not
limited to providing housing, new industry, and jobs for the citizens of the county.
The authority shall have the powers provided in KRS 65.370 and 65.375 and in the
interlocal cooperation agreement.
Section 4. KRS 91.285 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any city of the first class which finds and declares that there exists abandoned
urban property as defined in KRS 132.012(1) within the city or which finds that
there exists blighted or abandoned[deteriorated] property pursuant to KRS 99.700
to 99.730 may levy a separate rate of taxation on abandoned urban property
pursuant to KRS 132.012(2).
(2) Prior to levying a tax upon abandoned urban property, the legislative body of a city
of the first class shall delegate to the vacant properties review commission, if
established pursuant to KRS 99.700 to 99.730 or another department or agency of
city government, the responsibility of determining which properties within the city
Page 2 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
are abandoned urban properties. A list of abandoned urban properties shall be
furnished to the county property valuation administrator prior to the date fixed for
the annual assessment of real property within the county. If a property classified as
abandoned urban property is repaired, rehabilitated or otherwise returned to
productive use, the owner shall notify the city which shall, if it finds the property is
no longer abandoned urban property, notify the property valuation administrator to
strike the property from the list of abandoned urban properties.
Section 5. KRS 92.305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any urban-county government or city of the home rule class which finds and
declares that there exists abandoned urban property as defined in KRS 132.012
within the urban-county government or city, or which finds that there exists
blighted or abandoned[deteriorated] property pursuant to KRS 99.700 to 99.730,
may levy a separate rate of taxation on abandoned urban property pursuant to KRS
132.012.
(2) Prior to levying a tax upon abandoned urban property, the legislative body of the
urban-county government or the city of the home rule class shall delegate to the
vacant properties review commission, if established pursuant to KRS 99.710, or
another department or agency of the urban-county or city government, the
responsibility of determining which properties within the urban-county government
or city are abandoned urban properties. A list of abandoned urban properties shall
be furnished to the county property valuation administrator prior to the date fixed
for the annual assessment of real property within the county. If a property classified
as abandoned urban property is repaired, rehabilitated, or otherwise returned to
productive use, the owner shall notify the urban-county government or city which
shall, if it finds the property is no longer abandoned urban property, notify the
property valuation administrator to strike the property from the list of abandoned
urban properties.
Page 3 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
Section 6. KRS 99.700 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is hereby found:
(a) That there exist within the jurisdiction of many local governments in this
Commonwealth blighted and abandoned[deteriorated] properties in
neighborhoods which cause the deterioration of those and contiguous
neighborhoods and constitute a serious and growing menace which is
injurious to the public health, safety, morals, and general welfare of the
residents of the Commonwealth, and are beyond remedy and control solely by
regulatory process in the exercise of the police power;
(b) That the existence of blighted and abandoned[deteriorated] properties within
neighborhoods, and the growth and spread of blight and deterioration or the
threatened deterioration of other neighborhoods and properties:
1. Contribute substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and
crime, and to losses by fire and accident;
2. Necessitate expensive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds
for the preservation of the public health and safety, for crime prevention,
correction, prosecution, and punishment, for the treatment of juvenile
delinquency, for the maintenance of adequate police, fire and accident
protection, and for other public services and facilities;
3. Constitute an economic and social liability;
4. Substantially impair or arrest the sound growth of the community;
5. Retard the provision of decent, safe, and sanitary housing
accommodations;
6. Depreciate assessable values;
7. Cause an abnormal exodus of families from these neighborhoods; and
8. Are detrimental to the health, the well-being, and the dignity of many
residents of these neighborhoods;
Page 4 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
(c) That this menace cannot be effectively dealt with by private enterprise
without the aids provided herein; and
(d) That the benefits which would result from eliminating the blighted or
abandoned properties that cause the blight and deterioration of neighborhoods
will accrue to the inhabitants of the neighborhoods in which these conditions
exist and to the inhabitants of this Commonwealth generally.
(2) It is hereby declared:
(a) That it is the policy of this Commonwealth to protect and promote the health,
safety, and welfare of the people of the Commonwealth by eliminating the
blight and deterioration of neighborhoods through the elimination of blighted
and abandoned[deteriorated] properties within these neighborhoods;
(b) That the elimination of such blight and deterioration and the preparation of the
properties for sale or lease, for development or redevelopment, constitute a
public use and purpose for which public money may be expended and private
property acquired and are governmental functions in the interest of the health,
safety, and welfare of the people of the Commonwealth; and
(c) That the necessity in the public interest for the provisions enacted herein is
hereby declared to be a legislative determination.
Section 7. KRS 99.705 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 99.700 to 99.730:
(1) "Abandoned property" means property that:
(a) Has been substantially unoccupied or used for any commercial or
residential purpose for at least one (1) year by a person with a legal or
equitable right to occupy the property;
(b) Has been cited for a violation of an enforceable housing, maintenance, or
building code that has not been remedied within one hundred eighty (180)
days after the citation; and
Page 5 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
(c) For which property taxes have not been paid for at least two (2) years;
(2) "Alternative government entity" means an entity established by the legislative body
of a local government pursuant to KRS 65.350 to 65.375, 99.330 to 99.510, 99.520
to 99.590, or 99.610 to 99.680, with a purpose compatible with the purposes
expressed in KRS 99.700;
(3)[(2)] "Blighted[" or "deteriorated" ]property" means a[any vacant] structure[ or
vacant or unimproved lot or parcel of ground in a predominantly built-up
neighborhood]:
(a) That was inspected by the appropriate local government and cited for one
(1) or more enforceable housing, maintenance, or building code violations
that:
1. Affect the safety of the occupants or the public; and
2. Involve one (1) or more of the following:
a. A roof and roof-framing element;
b. Support walls, beams, and headers;
c. Foundation, footings, and subgrade conditions;
d. Light and ventilation;
e. Fire protection, including egress;
f. Internal utilities, including electricity, gas, and water;
g. Flooring and flooring elements; or
h. Walls, insulation, and exterior envelope;
(b) In which the cited housing, maintenance, or building code violations have
not been remedied within a reasonable time after two (2) notices to cure the
noncompliance; and
(c) For which the satisfaction of those enforceable, cited, and uncured housing,
maintenance, or building code violations costs more than fifty percent
(50%) of the taxable market value of the structure as determined by the
Page 6 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
property valuation administrator in the taxable year in which the
condemnation proceeding is commenced, exclusive of the value of the land
on which the structure is situated[Which because of physical condition or
use is regarded as a public nuisance at common law or has been declared a
public nuisance in accordance with the housing, building, plumbing, fire,
nuisance, or related codes];
(b) Which because of physical condition, use, or occupancy is considered an
attractive nuisance to children, including but not limited to abandoned wells,
shafts, basements, excavations, and unsafe fences or structures;
(c) Which, because it is dilapidated, unsanitary, unsafe, vermin-infested, or
lacking in the facilities and equipment required by the housing or nuisance
code of the local government in which it is located, has been designated by
the department responsible for enforcement of the housing or nuisance code
as unfit for human habitation;
(d) Which is a fire hazard, or is otherwise dangerous to the safety of persons or
property;
(e) From which the utilities, plumbing, heating, sewerage, or other facilities have
been disconnected, destroyed, removed, or rendered ineffective so that the
property is unfit for its intended use;
(f) Which by reason of neglect or lack of maintenance has become a place for
accumulation of trash and debris, or a haven for rodents or other vermin;
(g) Which has been tax delinquent for a period of at least three (3) years; or
(h) Which has not been brought into compliance with the housing, building,
plumbing, electrical, fire, or nuisance code of the local government within
which it is located within the time constraints placed upon the owner by the
appropriate code enforcement agency];
(4)[(3)] "Commission" means a vacant property review commission established under
Page 7 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
KRS 99.710;
(5)[(4)] "Local government" means any city, county, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, unified local government, or charter county;
(6)[(5)] "Nuisance code" means an ordinance or ordinances adopted by a local
government pursuant to KRS 82.700 to 82.725 or a similar ordinance or ordinances
adopted by a local government pursuant to any other authority; and
(7)[(6)] "Redevelopment" means the planning or replanning, design or redesign,
acquisition, clearance, development, and disposal or any combination of these, of a
property in the preparation of such property for residential, commercial, public, or
related uses, as may be appropriate or necessary.
Section 8. KRS 99.710 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the legislative body of a local government finds and declares that there exist
within the jurisdiction of the local government blighted or abandoned[deteriorated]
properties and that there is need for the exercise of powers, functions, and duties
conferred by KRS 99.700 to 99.730 within the jurisdiction of the local government,
the legislative body may adopt the provisions of KRS 99.700 to 99.730 by
ordinance.
(2) The ordinance adopting the provisions of KRS 99.700 to 99.730 shall:
(a) Establish a vacant property review commission, which shall certify properties
as blighted or abandoned[deteriorated] to the legislative body. The ordinance
shall specify the duties of, the number of members that will serve on, the
requirements of membership, and the makeup of the commission. Members of
the commission shall be appointed by the mayor or the county
judge/executive, as the case may be, and approved by the legislative body; or
(b) Assign the duties that would otherwise be fulfilled by a vacant property
review commission under KRS 99.700 to 99.730 to an alternative government
entity.
Page 8 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
(3) The governing body of a local government adopting the provisions of KRS 99.700
to 99.730 may also, by ordinance, authorize the commission or alternative
government entity to identify and certify properties for inclusion in a tax
delinquency diversion program established by the local government as provided in
KRS 99.727.
(4) No officer or employee of the local government whose duties include enforcement
of housing, building, plumbing, fire, nuisance, or related codes shall be appointed to
the commission or serve on the governing body of an alternative government entity.
(5) Nothing in KRS 99.705 to 99.730 shall prevent the duties of a vacant property
review commission from being assigned to a local government code enforcement
board established pursuant to KRS 65.8801 to 65.8839.
Section 9. KRS 99.715 is amended to read as follows:
A local government may acquire, by eminent domain pursuant to KRS Chapter 416, any
property determined to be blighted or abandoned[deteriorated] pursuant to KRS 99.700
to 99.730, and shall have the power to hold, clear, manage, or dispose of property so
acquired pursuant to the provisions of KRS 99.700 to 99.730.
Section 10. KRS 99.720 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body shall not institute eminent domain proceedings pursuant to
KRS 99.700 to 99.730 unless the commission or alternative government entity has
certified that the property is blighted or abandoned[deteriorated]. A property which
has been referred to the commission or alternative government entity by a local
government as blighted or abandoned[deteriorated] may only be certified to the
legislative body as blighted or abandoned[deteriorated] after the commission or
alternative government entity has determined:
(a) That the owner of the property or designated agent has been sent two (2)
notices[an order] by the appropriate local government agency to eliminate the
conditions which are in violation of local codes or law;
Page 9 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
(b) That the property is vacant;
(c) That the property is blighted or abandoned[and deteriorated]; and
(d) That the commission or alternative government entity has notified the
property owner or designated agent that:
1. The property has been determined to be blighted or
abandoned;[deteriorated and ]
2. The time period for correction of that[such] condition has expired; and
3. The property owner or agent has failed to comply with the notice.
(2) The findings required by subsection (1) of this section shall be in writing and
included in the report to the legislative body.
(3) (a) The commission or alternative government entity shall notify the owner of the
property or a designated agent that a determination of blight or
abandonment[deterioration] has been made and that failure to eliminate the
conditions causing the blight or abandonment shall render the property
subject to condemnation by the local government under KRS 99.700 to
99.730.
(b) Notice shall be mailed to the owner or designated agent by certified mail,
return receipt requested. However, if the address of the owner or a designated
agent is unknown and cannot be ascertained by the commission or alternative
government entity in the exercise of reasonable diligence, copies of the notice
shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the property affected.
(c) The written notice sent to the owner or his or her agent or posted on the
property shall describe the conditions that render the property blighted or
abandoned[and deteriorated], and shall demand abatement of the conditions
within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the[such] notice.
(4) An extension of the ninety (90) day time period may be granted by the commission
or alternative government entity if the owner or designated agent demonstrates that
Page 10 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
such period is insufficient to correct the conditions cited in the notice.
Section 11. KRS 99.725 is amended to read as follows:
The legislative body of the local government may institute eminent domain proceedings
pursuant to KRS Chapter 416 against any property which has been certified as blighted or
abandoned[deteriorated] by the commission or alternative government entity if:
(1) It finds:
(a)[(1)] That the[such] property has deteriorated to such an extent as to
constitute a serious and growing menace to the public health, safety and
welfare;
(b)[(2)] That the[such] property is likely to continue to deteriorate unless
corrected;
(c)[(3)] That the continued deterioration of the[such] property may contribute to
the blighting or deterioration of the area immediately surrounding the
property; and
(d)[(4)] That the owner of the[such] property has failed to correct the
deterioration of the property; and
(2) The legislative body of the local government:
(a) Holds a public hearing regarding the proposed taking of the blighted or
abandoned property and, at least thirty (30) days but not more than sixty
(60) days prior to the hearing:
1. Notifies each owner of property subject to the proposed taking in
writing by certified mail of the date and time of the public hearing;
and
2. Posts information regarding the public hearing, including the date
and time of the hearing and the address of the property subject to the
proposed taking, pursuant to KRS Chapter 424; and
(b) At its next regular meeting that is at least thirty (30) days after the public
Page 11 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
hearing, votes according to the rules of its proceedings to authorize the use
of eminent domain under the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, KRS
416.540 to 416.670, to acquire the property.
(3) Any interested person shall be allowed reasonable time to present relevant
testimony at the public hearing held under subsection (2) of this section. The
proceedings of the hearing shall be recorded and available to the public for
review and comment and reasonable times and at a reasonable place.
Section 12. KRS 99.727 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Census block" means an area within the jurisdiction of a local government
identified by the United States Census Bureau using a unique four (4) digit
number;
(b) "Certificate of delinquency" has the same meaning as in KRS 134.010;
(c) "Individual parcel" means a parcel of property not located in a priority project
area that has been designated by the commission or alternative government
entity as blighted or abandoned, and for which the area in which the property
is located:
1. Exhibits conditions that are favorable for development;
2. Has the resources needed for urban redevelopment; and
3. Has characteristics that can be promoted as part of a campaign to retain
existing residents and attract new residents to the area; and
(d) "Priority project area" means a specific group of properties identified by
census block, which are located in an area where:
1. There are a significant number of blighted or abandoned properties;
2. Existing conditions are favorable for development;
3. Existing resources needed for urban redevelopment are present; and
4. Existing characteristics of the area can be promoted as part of a
Page 12 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
campaign to retain existing residents and attract new residents to the
area.
(2) The legislative body of a consolidated local government may, by ordinance,
establish a tax delinquency diversion program for blighted or abandoned property.
(3) The ordinance establishing the program shall designate the commission or an
alternative government entity as the body responsible for identifying and certifying
priority project areas and individual parcels of property for inclusion in the tax
delinquency diversion program.
(4) The commission or alternative government entity shall submit recommended
priority project areas and qualifying individual parcels of property to the governing
body of the consolidated local government for consideration.
(5) Certificates of delinquency related to property approved by the governing body of
the consolidated local government for inclusion in the tax delinquency diversion
program shall not be available for purchase by any person for a period of up to five
(5) years following the year in which the property is placed in the tax delinquency
diversion program.
(6) The commission or alternative government entity shall provide to the county
attorney a list of all properties included in the tax delinquency diversion plan, and
the county attorney shall place the identified properties on the protected list
required by KRS 134.504(10).
Section 13. KRS 99.730 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No officer or employee of a local government, the vacant property review
commission, or an alternative government entity, who in the course of his or her
duties is required to participate in the determination of property blight or
abandonment[deterioration] or the issuance of notices on code violations which
may lead to a determination of blight or abandonment[deterioration], shall acquire
any interest in any property declared to be blighted or abandoned[deteriorated].
Page 13 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
(2) If any [such] officer or employee described in subsection (1) of this section owns
or has a financial interest, direct or indirect, in any property certified to be blighted
or abandoned[deteriorated], he or she shall immediately disclose, in writing,
the[such] interest to the commission or alternative government entity and to the
legislative body, and the[such] disclosure shall be entered in the minutes of the
commission or alternative government entity and of the legislative body. Failure to
so disclose the[such] interest shall constitute misconduct in office.
(3) No payment shall be made to any officer or employee for any property or interest
acquired by the local government from the[such] officer or employee unless the
amount of the[such] payment is fixed by court order in eminent domain
proceedings, or unless payment is unanimously approved by the legislative body.
Section 14. KRS 416.580 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Circuit Court, or in the absence of the Circuit Judge from the county, the
Circuit Court Clerk, shall appoint as commissioners three (3) impartial
housekeepers of the county who are owners of land. They shall be sworn to
faithfully and impartially discharge their duties under this section. The
commissioners shall view the land or material sought to be condemned and
award to the owner or owners such a sum as will fairly represent the reduction
in the market value of the entire property, all of or a portion of which is
sought to be condemned, said sum being the difference between the market
value of the entire property immediately before the taking and the market
value of the remainder of the property immediately after the taking[ thereof],
together with the fair rental value of any temporary easements sought to be
condemned. Within fifteen (15) days from the date of their appointment, they
shall return a written report to the office of the Circuit Court[,] stating the
above values in their award and shall describe in their report the property
sought to be condemned. They shall be allowed a reasonable fee which shall
Page 14 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
be taxed as costs.
(b) If any person appointed to serve as commissioner fails, refuses, or becomes
incapable of acting, the court[,] or judge thereof shall immediately[forthwith]
appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. A majority of the
commissioners appointed and qualified have the power to act and to make and
sign the award and report. If a majority of the commissioners do not agree on
a decision, three (3) new commissioners shall be appointed by the court on
application by any of the parties to the action.
(2) In eminent domain proceedings instituted pursuant to KRS 99.700 to 99.730, in
determining the market of value blighted or abandoned[deteriorated] property, the
commissioners shall consider:
(a) The estimated cost of repairs necessary to bring the property up to the
minimum standards of the local housing or nuisance code as determined by an
independent appraiser, general building or residential contractor or inspector;
or
(b) The cost of demolition of the property, if the commissioners determine that
demolition would be the most cost-effective manner of addressing the
blighted or abandoned[deteriorated] structures on the property.
Section 15. KRS 416.610 is amended to read as follows:
(1) After the owner has been summoned twenty (20) days, the court shall examine the
report of the commissioners to determine whether it conforms to the provisions of
KRS 416.580. If the report of the commissioners is not in the proper form, the
court shall require the commissioners to make necessary[such] corrections[ as are
necessary].
(2) If no answer or other pleading is filed by the owner or owners putting in issue the
right of the petitioner to condemn the property or the use and occupation of the
property[thereof] sought to be condemned, the court shall enter an interlocutory
Page 15 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
judgment which shall contain, in substance:
(a) A finding that the petitioner has the right, under the provisions of KRS
416.550 to 416.670 and other applicable law to condemn the property or the
use and occupation of the property[thereof];
(b) A finding that the report of the commissioners conforms to the provisions of
KRS 416.580;
(c) An authorization to take possession of the property for the purposes and under
the conditions and limitations, if any, set forth in the petition upon payment to
the owner or to the clerk of the court the amount of the compensation awarded
by the commissioners;
(d) Proper provision for the conveyance of the title to the land and material, to the
extent condemned, as adjudged therein in the event no exception is taken as
provided in KRS 416.620(1).
(3) Any exception from the[such] interlocutory judgment by either party or both parties
shall be confined solely to exceptions to the amount of compensation awarded by
the commissioners.
(4) (a) If the owner has filed answer or pleading putting in issue the right of the
petitioner to condemn the property or use and occupation of the
property[thereof] sought to be condemned, the court shall, without
intervention of jury, proceed forthwith to hear and determine whether or not
the petitioner has that[such] right.
(b) In determining whether the petitioner has the right to condemn the property
or the use and occupation of the property sought to be condemned, the
petitioner bears the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence
that the:
1. Property the petitioner seeks to acquire is required for a public use;
2. Petitioner has a plan that reflects a reasonable schedule to complete
Page 16 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
the public use after the petitioner takes ownership of the property;
3. Petitioner has access to funding to complete the public use; and
4. Public use cannot be accomplished by using or acquiring other
property with the consent of the owner of the other property without
an unreasonable delay or increase in cost.
(c) If the court determines that the petitioner has the right to condemn the
property or the use and occupation of the property sought to be
condemned[such rights], an interlocutory judgment, as provided for in
subsection (2) of this section, shall be entered.
(d) If the court determines that petitioner does not have the[such] right to
condemn the property or the use and occupation of the property sought to
be condemned, it shall enter a final judgment which shall contain, in
substance:
1.[(a)] A finding that the report of the commissioners conforms to the
provisions of KRS 416.580;
2.[(b)] A finding that the petitioner is not authorized to condemn the
property or the use and occupation of the property[thereof] for the
purposes and under the conditions and limitations set forth in the
petition, stating the particular ground or grounds on which the petitioner
is not so authorized;
and
3.[(c)] An order dismissing the petition and directing the petitioner to pay
all costs.
Section 16. KRS 416.675 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every grant of authority contained in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to exercise the
power of eminent domain shall be subject to the condition that the authority be
exercised only to effectuate a public use of the condemned property.
Page 17 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1034
(2) "Public use" means[shall mean the following]:
(a) [Ownership of the property by the Commonwealth, a political subdivision of
the Commonwealth, or other governmental entity;
(b)] The possession, occupation, or enjoyment of the property by the general
public or[as a matter of right] by the Commonwealth, a political subdivision
of the Commonwealth, or other governmental entity;
(b)[(c)] The acquisition and transfer of blighted or abandoned property [for the
purpose of eliminating blighted areas, slum areas, or substandard and
insanitary areas ]in accordance with KRS Chapter 99; or
(c)[(d)] The use of the property for the [creation or ]operation of public utilities
that serve the general public[or common carriers; or
(e) Other use of the property expressly authorized by statute].
(3) No provision in the law of the Commonwealth shall be construed to authorize the
condemnation of private property for transfer to a private owner for the purpose of
economic development that benefits the general public only indirectly, such as by
increasing the tax base, tax revenues, or employment, or by promoting the general
economic health of the community.[ However, this provision shall not prohibit the
sale or lease of property to private entities that occupy an incidental area within a
public project or building, provided that no property may be condemned primarily
for the purpose of facilitating an incidental private use.]
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a taking of private property
for a public use because the public use provides ancillary economic benefits[The
exercise of the power of eminent domain for the acquisition of property financed by
state road funds or federal highway funds shall be exempt from the provisions of
this section].
Page 18 of 18
XXXX 1/9/2025 5:00 PM Jacketed